Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5
SPECIAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS IN MUNICIPALITIES

Cross references:

For public improvement districts, see article 20 of title 30.

Law reviews:

For article, "Management and Mismanagement of Municipal Special Improvement Districts", see 22

C

olo. Law. 2263 (1993); for article, "Improvement Districts for

C

olorado Counties, Cities, and Towns", see 30 Colo. Law. 53 (Jan. 2001).

31-25-500.2. Legislative declaration - energy efficiency and renewable energy production projects.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that:

The production and efficient use of energy will continue to play a central role in the future of this state and the nation as a whole; and

The development, production, and efficient use of renewable energy will advance the security, economic well-being, and public and environmental health of this state, as well as contributing to the energy independence of our nation.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the inclusion of energy efficiency and renewable energy production projects for residential and commercial use in special improvement districts, and powers conferred under this part 5, as well as the expenditures of public moneys made pursuant to this part 5, will serve a valid public purpose and that the enactment of this part 5 is expressly declared to be in the public interest.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1300, § 21, effective May 27.

31-25-501. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Assessment unit" means an area within a district which is separately defined for determining assessments payable pursuant to this part 5.

(1.5) "District" means the geographical division of the municipality and, in accordance with the provisions of this part 5, the county in which such municipality is situated, or any other municipality within such county, within which any local improvement may be made or, when so declared by the governing body, may include the entire municipal area. One or more noncontiguous parts or sections of property may be included in one district.

(1.7) (a) "Elector of the district" means a person who, at the designated time or event, is registered to vote in the general election in this state and:

Who is a resident of the district or the area to be included in the district; or

Who or whose spouse or civil union partner owns taxable real or personal property within the district or the area to be included in the district whether or not said person resides within the district.

Where the owner of taxable real or personal property specified in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) this subsection (1.7) is not a natural person, an "elector of the district" shall include a natural person designated by such owner to vote for such person. Such designation shall be in writing and filed with the clerk of the municipality. Only one such person may be designated by an owner.

(1.9) "Energy efficiency improvement" means an installation or modification that is designed to reduce energy consumption in residential or commercial buildings and includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Insulation in walls, roofs, floors, and foundations and in heating and cooling distribution systems;

Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, heat-absorbing or heat-reflective glazed and coated window and door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass area, and other window and door system modifications that reduce energy consumption;

Automatic energy control systems;

Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning and distribution system modifications or replacements in buildings or central plants;

Caulking and weatherstripping;

Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to increase the energy efficiency of the system without increasing the overall illumination of a residential or commercial building unless such increase in illumination is necessary to conform to the applicable building code for the proposed lighting system;

Energy recovery systems;

Daylighting systems; and

Any other modification, installation, or remodeling approved as a utility cost-savings measure by the governing body; except that no renewable energy improvement shall be authorized that interferes with a right held by a public utility under a certificate issued by the public utilities commission under article 5 of title 40, C.R.S. The public utilities commission shall have primary jurisdiction to adjudicate disputes as to whether a renewable energy improvement interferes with such a right.

"Owner", in reference to petitions, means only persons in whom the record fee title is vested, although subject to lien or encumbrance.

"Property" means all land, whether platted or unplatted, regardless of improvements thereon and regardless of lot or land lines. The term also includes the franchise of any railroad whose tracks lie, either lengthwise or crosswise, within any street improved under this part 5. Lots may be designated in accordance with any recorded map or plat thereof, unplatted lands by any definite description thereof, and franchises by the name of the corporation owning the same.

(3.5) "Qualified community location" means:

If the affected local electric utility is not an investor-owned utility, an off-site location of a renewable energy improvement that:

Is wholly owned, through either an undivided or a fractional interest, by the owner or owners of the residential or commercial building or buildings that are directly benefited by the renewable energy improvement;

Provides energy as a direct credit on the owner's utility bill; and

Is an encumbrance on the property specifically benefited.

If the affected local electric utility is an investor-owned utility, a community solar garden as that term is defined in section 40-2-127 (2), or a community geothermal garden as that term is defined in section 42-2-127.5 (2).

"Renewable energy improvement" means a fixture, product, system, device, or interacting group of devices that produces energy from renewable resources, including photovoltaic systems, solar thermal systems, small wind systems, biomass systems, hydroelectric systems, or geothermal systems, as may be authorized by the governing body, and that either:

Is installed behind the meter of a residential or commercial building; or

Directly benefits a residential or commercial building through a qualified community location.

No renewable energy improvement shall be authorized that interferes with a right held by a public utility under a certificate issued by the public utilities commission under article 5 of title 40, C.R.S. Nothing in this part 5 limits the right of a public utility, subject to article 3 or 3.5 of title 40, C.R.S., or section 40-9.5-106, C.R.S., to assess fees for the use of its facilities, or modifies or expands the net metering limitations established in section 40-9.5-118, C.R.S. The public utilities commission has primary jurisdiction to adjudicate disputes as to whether a renewable energy improvement interferes with such a right.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1190, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) R&RE and (1.5) added, p. 1047, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1.5) amended, p. 1472, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1.7) added, p. 518, § 16, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1.7) amended, p. 272, § 12, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(1.9) and (4) added, p. 1300, § 22, effective May 27.

L. 2010:

(3.5) added and (4) amended, (SB 10-100), ch. 207, p. 903, § 7, effective May 5.

L. 2016:

(1.7)(a) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 592, § 78, effective May 18.

L. 2022:

(3.5)(b) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2379, § 14, effective August 10.

31-25-502. Powers to make local improvements.

A district may be formed in accordance with the requirements of this part 5 for the purpose of constructing, installing, or acquiring any public improvement so long as the municipality that forms the district is authorized to provide such improvement under the municipality's home rule charter or ordinance passed pursuant to such charter, if any, or the laws of this state. Public improvements shall not include any facility identified in section 30-20-101 (8) or (9), C.R.S.

The improvements authorized by this part 5 may include, where so specified or generally provided for in the ordinance of the governing body forming the district, any renewable energy improvement or energy efficiency improvement to any residential or commercial property within the district.

It is lawful for any municipality to construct any of the local improvements mentioned in this part 5 and to assess the cost thereof, wholly or in part, upon the property especially benefited by such improvements. The improvements shall be authorized by ordinance duly adopted and shall be constructed under the direction of the municipal engineer or other officer having similar duties or under the direction of the governing body in accordance with plans and specifications adopted by the governing body; except that, for districts formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing renewable energy improvements or energy efficiency improvements, the owner of property within a district may arrange improvements that qualify pursuant to the ordinance of the governing body authorizing improvements for the district and may obtain financing for said improvements from the district through the process set forth in the ordinance forming the district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1190, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 273, § 13, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1301, § 23, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-502 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-503. What improvements may be made - conditions.

A district may be created within the boundaries of a municipality and may also include any property in the unincorporated area of the county within which the municipality is situated if such county consents by resolution to such district and the construction or acquisition of improvements therein. In addition, such district may also include any property in another municipality within such county if such municipality consents by ordinance to such district and the construction or acquisition of the improvements therein. If a district includes property within a county by county consent or within another municipality by municipal consent, the municipality shall have full authority to construct or acquire improvements, to assess property within the county or such municipality benefited by such improvements, and to enforce and collect such assessments in the manner provided in this part 5; but:

No improvement, except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) and except for sidewalks, water mains, sewers, and sewage disposal works and their appurtenances, shall be ordered under this part 5 unless a petition for the same is first presented. The petition shall be subscribed by the owners of property to be assessed for more than one-half of the entire costs estimated by the governing body to be assessed. Except as specified in this section, nothing in this part 5 shall restrict the right of such owners from securing any particular kind or variety of improvements petitioned for. In any case where a proposed improvement district includes two or more assessment units, the owners of property to be assessed for more than one-half of the entire costs estimated by the governing body to be assessed in each assessment unit shall petition as specified in this part 5.

If the owners of property to be assessed for more than one-half of the entire costs estimated by the governing body to be assessed petition for any particular kind of improvement and for any particular materials to be used in the same, the improvement shall be ordered in accordance with the petition, and the materials so designated shall be used, except as otherwise provided in this section;

If the material petitioned for by the owners of property to be assessed for more than one-half of the entire costs estimated by the governing body to be assessed does not encourage competition, the petitioners shall have the right to state in the petition the maximum price per square yard or linear foot or per unit at which the improvement is desired, and no contract shall be let for any such improvement at a price exceeding the maximum price fixed in said petition, excluding the cost of engineering, collection, inspection, incidentals, and interest;

Any improvement may be initiated directly by the governing body by resolution declaring its intention to construct the improvements. If initiated by such resolution, the governing body shall make a preliminary order as required by subsection (3) of this section in the same manner as if the improvements had been requested by petition. Such preliminary order may be included in the resolution of intention to construct the improvements. However, if written protests are submitted prior to the hearing referred to in subsection (4) of this section subscribed by the owners of property to be assessed for more than one-half of the entire costs estimated by the governing body to be assessed, the governing body shall not proceed with such special improvement district, based on the preliminary order so protested. Such protests shall not prevent the governing body from adopting a subsequent preliminary order for such improvements, subject to notice, hearing, and protest, as provided in this part 5.

The governing body shall encourage competition by advertising for and receiving bids for such construction and, insofar as possible within the limits of the petition, shall describe all materials by standard or quality in the specifications.

Before contracting for or ordering any work to be constructed, a preliminary order shall be made by the governing body, adopting preliminary plans and specifications for the same, definitely describing the materials to be used or stating that one of several specified materials shall be chosen, determining the number of installments and the time in which the cost of the improvement shall be payable, and the property to be assessed for the same, as provided in this part 5, and requiring an estimate of the cost to be made by the municipal engineer or any similar officer or employee, together with a map of the district in which the improvement is to be made and a schedule showing the approximate amounts to be assessed upon the several lots or parcels of property within the district. The cost estimates and approximate amounts to be assessed shall be formulated in good faith on the basis of the best information available to the governing body but shall not be binding.

The clerk shall give notice of the hearing on the construction of the improvements by publication in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, the publication to be at least twenty days prior to the date of the hearing. In addition, notice shall be mailed by first-class mail to each property owner to be assessed for the cost of the improvements who is included within the district. The mailed notice shall be made on or about the date of the publication of the notice of hearing. The notice shall set forth the following information:

The kind of improvements proposed;

The number of installments;

The time in which the cost shall be payable;

Repealed.

The extent of the district to be improved;

The probable cost per front foot or other unit basis which, in the judgment of the governing body, reflects the benefits which accrue to the properties to be assessed, as shown by the estimates of the engineer;

The time, not less than twenty days after the publication, when an ordinance authorizing the improvements will be considered;

That said map and estimate and schedule showing the approximate amounts to be assessed and all resolutions and proceedings are on file and can be seen and examined by any interested person at the office of the clerk, or other designated place, at any time within said period of twenty days; and

That all complaints and objections made in writing concerning the proposed improvement by the owners of any property to be assessed will be heard and determined by the governing body before final action is taken.

(4.5) If the petition for an improvement is signed by one hundred percent of the owners of property to be assessed and contains a request for such waiver, the governing body may, at its discretion, waive all or any of the requirements for notice, publication, and a hearing set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

The finding by ordinance or resolution of the governing body that said improvements were duly ordered after notice duly given and after hearing duly held when such notice and hearing are required pursuant to this section, that such petition was presented, and that the petition was subscribed by all or the required number of owners shall be conclusive of the facts so stated in every court or other tribunal.

Any resolution or order in the premises may be modified, confirmed, or rescinded at any time prior to the passage of the ordinance authorizing the improvements.

The specifications for paving may include sidewalks, curbs, gutters, and grading, and sufficient culverts, sewers, or drains necessary to carry off the surface waters across or along the line of the street improved, and such other incidentals to paving as, in the judgment of the governing body, may be required. The specifications may also provide that bidders shall agree to enter into contract to do the work and maintain the same in good repair for a period of five years, and the contract may be entered into in accordance with such specifications.

If, before any such improvements are made, any piece of real estate or any railway company to be assessed already has an improvement conforming to the general plan or satisfactory to the governing body, an allowance therefor may be made to the owner, and such allowance may be deducted from the owner's assessment and from the contract price.

Any other provision of this part 5 to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing body may create a district for the purpose of acquiring existing improvements of a character authorized by this part 5, in which case, the provisions of this part 5 concerning construction of improvements by the municipality, competitive bidding, and preliminary plans and specifications shall not apply.

Any other provision of this part 5 notwithstanding, the governing body may create an improvement district for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing renewable energy improvements and energy efficiency improvements of a character authorized by section 31-25-502 (2). Any such district shall include only property for which the owner has executed a contract or agreement consenting to the inclusion of such property within the district, and such consent may occur subsequent to the adoption of the ordinance of the governing body forming the district. The inclusion of such property within the district subsequent to the adoption of the ordinance of the governing body forming the district may be made by the adoption of a supplemental or amending ordinance or resolution of the governing body. For districts formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing renewable energy improvements or energy efficiency improvements, the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section concerning preliminary orders, competitive bidding, and preliminary plans and specifications, of section 31-25-516 concerning contracts for construction, and of section 31-25-518 concerning contract provisions shall not apply.

The contract or agreement shall note the existence of any first priority mortgage or deed of trust on the property, the identity of the record holder thereof, and the penalty for default provided in section 31-25-530 clearly stating that default, like the penalties that exist for default on any mortgage or any other special assessment, may result in the loss of the applicant's home. Within thirty days of a person's submission of an application to the district, the governing body shall provide written notice to the record holder of any first priority mortgage or deed of trust on the real property that the person is participating in the district.

The governing body is authorized to enter into contracts and agreements with any owner of property within the district or any other person concerning the construction or acquisition of improvements, the assessment of the cost thereof, the waiver or limitation of legal rights, or any other matter concerning the district.

At or about the time of publication by the governing body of any ordinance creating a district, a copy of such ordinance shall be provided to the county assessor, the county treasurer, and the division of local government in the department of local affairs. The governing body shall make a good faith attempt to comply with this subsection (11), but failure to comply shall not affect or impair the organization of any district, the construction or acquisition of improvements therein, the levying and collection of assessments, or any other matter pursuant to the provisions of this part 5.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1190, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(a) and IP(4) amended and (1)(d) added, pp. 1279, 1280, §§ 1, 2, effective May 22.

L. 81:

IP(1) amended, p. 1456, § 4, effective May 27.

L. 84:

(4.5) added and (5) amended, p. 839, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 86:

(1), (3), IP(4), (4)(f), (4)(g), and (4)(i) amended, (4)(d) repealed, and (9) to (11) added, pp. 1044, 1062, §§ 1, 39, effective July 1.

L. 90:

IP(1) amended, p. 1472, § 6, effective July 1; (11) R&RE, p. 1473, § 7, effective October 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 273, § 14, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(9) amended, p. 1302, § 24, effective May 27.

L. 2010:

(9)(c) added, (SB 10-100), ch. 207, p. 904, § 8, effective May 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-503 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-504. Municipality may establish sewer systems.

Any municipality may establish and maintain sewer systems and sewage disposal plants for sanitary or storm drainage.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1192, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-525 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-505. District sanitary sewers - contracts - contiguous towns.

When the governing body declares the same necessary for sanitary reasons, it may order the construction of district sanitary sewers in districts to be prescribed by ordinance so as to connect with any public or district sewer or with some natural drainage or disposal plant. Such districts, by like authority, may be divided into subdistricts or enlarged, diminished, or otherwise altered by ordinance at any time in accordance with the provisions of this part 5. The contract for district sewers may include all necessary manholes, inlets, and appurtenances and such mains of such reasonable extent outside the district as may be necessary to connect the district with a public sewer or some natural drainage or disposal plant. Contiguous municipalities may unite in the construction of a common sewer or cooperate in such construction or extend to each other the right to use any sewer constructed or to be constructed when such use may be deemed necessary for the discharge of the sewage of either, and such cooperation, common construction, or use shall be upon such terms as regards the apportionment of cost as may be agreed upon between the governing bodies of such contiguous municipalities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1192, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-526 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-506. Private sewers - connection.

Private sanitary sewers connecting with public or district sanitary sewers may be constructed under such restrictions and subject to such regulations as may be prescribed by ordinance. No expense shall be incurred by the municipality in constructing or maintaining private sewers. The owner of any premises in any sewer district may be compelled by ordinance to connect the same with the district sewer at his own expense.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1193, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-527 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-507. Determination of special benefits - factors considered.

The term "benefit", for the purposes of assessing a particular property within a district, includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Any increase in the market value of the property;

The provision for accepting the burden from specific dominant property for discharging surface water onto servient property in a manner or quantity greater than would naturally flow because the dominant owner made some of his property impermeable;

Any adaptability of property to a superior or more profitable use;

Any alleviation of health and sanitation hazards accruing to particular property or accruing to public property in the improvement district, if the provision of health and sanitation is paid for wholly or partially out of funds derived from taxation of property owners of the improvement district;

Any reduction in the maintenance costs of particular property or of public property in the improvement district, if the maintenance of the public property is paid for wholly or partially out of funds derived from taxation of property owners of the improvement district;

Any increase in convenience or reduction in inconvenience accruing to particular property owners, including the facilitation of access to and travel over streets;

Recreational improvements accruing to particular property owners as a direct result of drainage improvement.

As used in connection with any district formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing improvements as authorized in section 31-25-502 (2), the term "benefit" shall include, but not be limited to, any acknowledged value set forth in the contracts and agreements entered into by the owner of the assessed property.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 997, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 86:

IP(1) amended, p. 1046, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) added, p. 1302, § 25, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 31-25-506.5 in Senate Bill 75-052 but was renumbered on revision in 1977 for ease of location.

31-25-508. Storm drainage sewers - districts.

The governing body may order the construction of district sewers for storm drainage in districts to be known as storm sewer districts, the same to be prescribed by ordinance. Such sewers may include the necessary manholes, inlets, and appurtenances and shall be so constructed as to connect with some other sufficient public sewer or some natural drainage. Such districts may be divided into subdistricts to be especially named or numbered in said ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1193, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-509. Subdistricts in sewer districts.

At the time of ordering the construction of district sanitary or storm sewers or at any time thereafter, the construction may be ordered in like manner in subdistricts, in such manner as to connect the subdistricts, or such part thereof, with the district sanitary or storm sewer for the purpose of sanitary or storm drainage. The cost of subdistrict sanitary or storm sewers in each subdistrict or part thereof, with the appurtenances, may be assessed upon all the land in the subdistrict or in the part improved in proportion as the area of each piece of land in the subdistrict or in the part improved is to the area of all the land in the subdistrict or in the part improved exclusive of public highways. Combined sewers for sanitary and storm drainage may be authorized and constructed in the same manner as provided for the construction of sanitary or storm sewers and the cost thereof assessed in the same manner and proportion.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1193, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-510. Improvements may be constructed under other laws.

Nothing in this part 5 shall prejudice or affect the right to construct local improvements by virtue of any other law of this state. No other act or law shall prejudice the right to construct local improvements under this part 5. If constructed in pursuance of this part 5, the same shall be made to appear in the original petition and in the ordinance authorizing the improvements.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1193, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-511. Property of irregular form - assessment.

When any lot or parcel of land is V-shaped or of any irregular form, such allowance may be made by ordinance in any assessment as may be equitable and just, or any allowance may be refused, and, in case of any unusual area or proportion of intersections, the municipality may pay not exceeding one-half of the cost of any such intersection, and in such case the remainder only shall be assessed against the property improved.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1193, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-512. Cost assessed in proportion to area.

The costs of any district sanitary sewer, including inlets, manholes, connecting mains, and appurtenances, with interest, and of district storm sewers may be assessed by ordinance upon all the real estate in the district, in proportion as the area of each piece of real estate in the district bears to the area of all the real estate in the district, exclusive of public highways.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1193, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-513. Cost assessed in accordance with benefits.

The cost of improvements constructed or acquired pursuant to this part 5, or such part thereof as may be assessed against the property specially benefited, including the intersections of streets and alleys except the share to be assessed against railway companies, may be assessed on property, without regard to lot or land lines, on a frontage, zone, or other equitable basis in accordance with benefits as the same may be determined by the governing body.

When the governing body determines that the improvement of any street or alley, including the intersections of streets and alleys, or any other improvement authorized by this part 5 results in special benefits to both the municipality and the owners of property within the district, that portion of the cost of the improvement which results in a special benefit to the municipality may be assessed against the municipality and be payable in installments, as provided in this part 5. The determination by the governing body as to the property to be assessed and the amount of special benefits shall be conclusive of the facts stated therein.

No cost of improvements to streets or alleys shall be assessed to any property where reasonable access to the street or alley is denied the owner of the property.

Any district formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing improvements as authorized in section 31-25-502 (2) shall assess the costs of the improvements to each property whose owner has entered into a contract or agreement for the improvements. The contracts and agreements entered into with the owner of property, as authorized by the governing body, shall be conclusive regarding the special benefit to the property and the amount that may be assessed against the property.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1193, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1469, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 86:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1047, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 1302, § 26, effective May 27.

31-25-514. Streets - railway companies subject to tax.

Whenever any grading, paving, or other kind of street improvement district is created under this part 5, the governing body may include in the area to be paved, graded, or otherwise improved the entire width of street from curb to curb or any part thereof, including the portion of said street occupied by or required by franchise obligation to be paid by or chargeable or assessable to any railway company whose railroad runs through or across any street in said district, and shall charge to, assess, and collect the proper proportion of the cost of the improvement from such railway company in the same manner as is provided for in case of other property, and shall issue bonds for the same, which bonds shall be issued and made payable in like manner as bonds issued for the improvement to be assessed against the real estate specially benefited.

In the meaning of this section, in the absence of a franchise obligation to grade or pave or otherwise improve, a railway company shall be held to occupy and is liable for the grading, paving, or other improvement of that part of the street lying between the rails of each track and two feet outside of each rail, and every railway company, whether street railway or otherwise, shall be assessed for the cost of such improvement of any part of any street or alley occupied by or required by franchise obligation to be so improved. The assessment levied for the cost of said improvements chargeable to a railway company shall be a perpetual tax lien against the entire franchise and property of the company, both within and without said district but within the limits of the municipality where such improvement is made, superior to all other liens except general tax liens.

All the terms, conditions, and provisions in this part 5 relative to the collection of the amounts chargeable against property specially benefited shall be applicable in the enforcement and collection of such assessment against such railway company, and the property of such railway company, in case of default in payment of such assessment, shall be sold as in cases of default in payment of general taxes levied thereon; but railway trackage shall not be considered or computed as assessable frontage in determining the sufficiency of petitions.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1194, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-515. Utility connections may be ordered before paving - costs - default.

Before paving in any district in pursuance of this part 5, the governing body may order the owners of the abutting property to connect their several premises with the gas or water mains or with any other utility in the street in front of their several premises. Upon default of any owner for thirty days after such order to make such connections, the municipality may contract for and make the connections at such distance, under such regulations, and in accordance with such specifications as may be prescribed by the governing body. The whole cost of each connection shall be assessed against the property with which the connection is made, and the cost shall be paid upon the completion of the work in one sum. The cost shall be assessed, shall become a lien, and shall be collected in the same manner as is provided in this part 5 for the assessment and collection of the cost of other special improvements. Upon default in the payment of any such assessment, the property shall be sold in like manner and with like effect.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1194, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-516. Contracts for construction - bond - default.

Except as provided in this section, all local improvements made under the provisions of this part 5 shall be constructed by independent contract, and all contracts shall be let by the mayor with the approval of the governing body. All such contracts shall be let to the lowest reliable and responsible bidder after public advertisement once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in such municipality; but, after such advertisement, if it is determined by the governing body that the bids are too high or that the proposed improvement can be made by the municipality for less than the bid of the lowest reliable and responsible bidder, such municipality is hereby empowered to provide for doing the work by hiring labor by the day or otherwise and to arrange for purchasing necessary material, all under the supervision of the governing body.

Except when the municipality does the work, no contract shall be made without a surety bond for its faithful performance with sufficient sureties to be approved by the governing body. No surety shall be accepted or approved by the governing body or mayor, other than a corporate surety company, unless he is the owner of real estate in this state, free and clear of all encumbrances, in double the amount of his liability on all bonds upon which he may then be surety. Upon default in the performance of any contract, the governing body may advertise and relet the remainder of the work in like manner without further ordinance and deduct the cost from the original contract price or, with the approval of the governing body, advance any excess out of the funds of the municipality and recover the same by suit on the original bond. In all advertisements the right shall be reserved to reject any or all bids and, upon rejecting all bids, if deemed advisable by the governing body, other bids may be advertised for.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1195, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-517. Sidewalks - water mains - sewers.

In ordering the construction of sidewalks, water mains, or sewers, the procedure shall be as required in section 31-25-503 (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (8) but shall not be subject to section 31-25-503 (1)(a) to (1)(c) and (7).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1195, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-518. Provisions to be inserted.

Every contract shall provide that it is subject to the provisions of the laws under which the municipality exists and of the ordinance authorizing the improvement; that the aggregate payment thereon shall not exceed the amount appropriated; that, upon ten days' written notice by the mayor to the contractor, the work under such contract, without cost or claim against the municipality, may be suspended for substantial cause; and that, upon complaint by any owner of land to be assessed for the improvement that the improvement is not being constructed in accordance with the contract, the governing body may consider the complaint and make such order in the premises as shall be just. Such order shall be final.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1195, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1048, § 6, effective July 1.